North Carolina, session 2025, HB522.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. ACCOUNTABILITY FOR DECEPTIVE OR UNFAIR TRADE PRACTICES
SECTION 1.1. Chapter 75 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
section to read:
"§ 75-45. Deceptive representation of healthcare services offered.
(a) A person or entity engages in deceptive or unfair practices under this Chapter when
the person or entity makes or disseminates an advertisement to the public that indicates the person
or entity provides abortions or emergency contraceptives, or provides referrals for abortions or
emergency contraceptives, when the person or entity knows or reasonably should know that the
person or entity does not provide those services.
(b) The learned profession exception of G.S. 75-1.1(b) does not apply to any person or
entity that publishes or causes to be published an advertisement that violates subsection (a) of
this section, as publishing of that advertisement is a general business dealing and is not a
professional service of a learned profession, regardless of whether the person or entity is a
healthcare provider licensed under Chapter 90 of the General Statutes.
(c) The Attorney General shall accept complaints alleging violations of this section
through the North Carolina Department of Justice website. The instructions, guidance, and forms
for submitting a complaint for violation of this section shall be able to be comprehended by
someone with a fifth grade reading level, accessible to people with disabilities, and the process
to submit a complaint shall be designed to be completed by the average internet user in no more
than 10 minutes.
(d) Before commencing a civil action for a violation of this section, the Attorney General
shall send notice to a person or entity that, based upon investigation by the Attorney General, the
person or entity is in violation of this section. The person or entity shall have 10 days to correct
the violation. If the person or entity has not responded to the notice within 10 days, the Attorney
General may initiate civil action against the person or entity.
(e) The Attorney General may bring an action to impose civil penalties and to seek other
appropriate relief under this Chapter or any other provision of law, including any of the
following:
(1) Injunctive relief compelling compliance with this section.
(2) An order requiring the person or entity to issue corrective advertising in the
same mediums and distributed through the same channels as the
advertisements in violation of this section.
(3) An order requiring the person or entity to post notice inside of the premises of
the location advertised for, in a conspicuous place that is visible to all who
enter the location or in an examination area or both, any of the following:
a. A clear, concise statement that there are or are not any licensed
medical doctors, registered nurses, or other licensed medical
practitioners on staff at the location.
b. A clear, concise statement that the following services are or are not
offered at the location: abortion care, emergency contraception, or
referrals for abortion or emergency contraception.
Page 2 House Bill 522-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(4) Any other narrowly tailored relief that the court deems necessary to remedy
the adverse effects of the violation of this section.
(f) In addition to any other relief or remedy under this Chapter or other provision of law,
in a civil action brought by a person injured by violation of this section, the court shall award to
a prevailing plaintiff attorneys' fees and costs, compensatory and punitive damages, and may
issue injunctive and declaratory relief.
(g) In any action brought for violation of this section, a court may award civil penalties
of not less than five hundred dollars ($500.00) and no more than five thousand dollars ($5,000)
per violation, the clear proceeds of which shall be paid to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund
in accordance with G.S. 115C-457.2."

PART II. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES EVALUATION OF
CRISIS PREGNANCY CENTERS DOING BUSINESS IN THE STATE
SECTION 2.1.(a) By May 1, 2026, the Department of Health and Human Services
shall evaluate and report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human
Services and the Fiscal Research Division on the unmet health and resource needs facing
pregnant women in North Carolina and the impact of crisis pregnancy centers on the ability of
clients to obtain accurate, non-coercive healthcare information and timely access to a
comprehensive range of reproductive and sexual healthcare services that aligns with their
healthcare needs and supports their personal decision making. In conducting this evaluation, the
Department shall examine at least all of the following:
(1) The number of crisis pregnancy centers operating in the State that receive
State funds, as defined in G.S. 143C-1-1(d)(25), in the form of a grant or direct
appropriation. The Department shall compile a list of the names and locations
of each crisis pregnancy center examined as a part of this study.
(2) The total amount of State funds, federal funds, State and federal tax subsidies,
and other subsidies, if any, each crisis pregnancy center identified in
subdivision (1) of this subsection received directly or indirectly, over the last
five years, broken down by location if the center conducts business or provides
services at more than one location.
(3) An explanation of whether each crisis pregnancy center is part of a larger
umbrella organization that operates within the State and, if so, the total amount
of State funds, federal funds, tax subsidies, or other subsidies, if any, the
umbrella organization received directly or indirectly over the last five years,
broken down by location if the umbrella organization conducts business or
provides services at more than one location.
(4) An explanation of all services provided by each crisis pregnancy center and
which services were most frequently sought, broken down by location if the
center conducts business or provides services at more than one location.
(5) The number of clients who annually access services at each crisis pregnancy
center.
(6) Whether crisis pregnancy centers hold themselves out to the public, either in
person, through community participation or events, or through their own
advertising or websites, as medical facilities or entities that provide
comprehensive, all-options pregnancy counseling.
(7) Whether clients seeking or accessing services at crisis pregnancy centers are
seeking comprehensive, all-options pregnancy counseling or services at
medical facilities, and whether clients have experienced a delay in receiving
healthcare, including the performance of an abortion or the initiation of
prenatal care, due to a visit to a crisis pregnancy center.
House Bill 522-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(8) Whether crisis pregnancy centers enroll clients in any public benefits
programs or connect clients to other services and, if so, a list of these programs
and services.
(9) The nature of information provided to clients or potential clients at crisis
pregnancy centers, and the nature of information included in crisis pregnancy
centers' operational manuals, handbooks, or guidelines in connection to the
provision of services to clients.
(10) The number of State-certified medical professionals on staff or volunteering
at each identified crisis pregnancy center, and the number who are providing
medical services or counseling on-site during regular business hours, and what
information each crisis pregnancy center provides to clients about the
presence of medical professionals on the premises, on staff, or serving in a
volunteer capacity.
(11) Whether crisis pregnancy centers collect medical information and an
explanation of what other information is collected upon intake, how crisis
pregnancy centers handle medical and other client records, and whether the
medical records are in compliance with federal and State laws governing
medical privacy.
(12) The number of crisis pregnancy centers that have an ultrasound machine on
the premises and, if one is present, whether the crisis pregnancy center has a
certified ultrasound technician on staff, either as a paid employee or volunteer.
SECTION 2.1.(b) As used in this section, the term "crisis pregnancy center" means
a nonprofit organization that holds itself out as a healthcare facility that provides care for
pregnant women and other clients, such as pregnancy counseling services, pregnancy testing,
ultrasound services, and other nonmedical pregnancy services. The term does not include a
hospital, ambulatory surgical facility, or clinic that performs abortions.
SECTION 2.2. Effective July 1, 2025, there is appropriated from the General Fund
to the Department of Health and Human Services the sum of two hundred fifty thousand dollars
($250,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be used to complete the
evaluation and report required by Section 2.1 of this act. The Department of Health and Human
Services may use funds appropriated by this section to hire a consultant to assist with completing
the evaluation and report.

PART III. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 3.1. Section 1.1 of this act becomes effective October 1, 2025, and applies
to advertisements published on or after that date. The remainder of this act is effective when it
becomes law.
Page 4 House Bill 522-First Edition